src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ==========================================================================
!                     North Sámi morphological analyser                     
! ==========================================================================


!! !!!Lexica for adjectives
! ---------------------


!! !!Bisyllabic adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - -



LEXICON BUORRE  !!= * __@CODE@__  For this adj only
! Positive
 +A:%>X7 NomVadj "good A" ;
 +A:%>X1 EssVadj "good A" ;
 +A:%>X7 EssVadj ;
 +A:%>   GOAHTI-OBLadj "good A" ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%> Px3V ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>X8 Px3V ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%>X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +A+Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:%>%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +A+Use/-Spell: VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation

! Comparative and superlative
 +A+Comp:%>X8b BUStem ;
 +A+Superl:%>X8muss BUOREMUS ;

! Derivation and compounding
 +A+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj. Here since buorre has no Attr, not compound.
! +A#+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ; ! comp-only adj. Here since buorre has no Attr
 +A#+Use/Circ:»X7# ALIT ;  ! both comp and independent adj. Here for ditto reason.

LEXICON BUOROT  !!= * __@CODE@__ SUB, Southern dialect

 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>buorot K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:%>buorot K ;
! +A+Comp+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:%>buorot K ;
 +A+Comp+Attr+Use/Sub:%>buorot K ;  


LEXICON ALKI  !!= * __@CODE@__  Bisyll V-Adj, -es-Attr, no WeG.
 +A:%>W2s ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%> BU/MUS ; ! no CG in comparative?

LEXICON SEARRA  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Adj's with s-Attr in WeG.
 +A:%>W1s ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;

LEXICON HOHPI  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Adj's with s-Attr. in WeG & Adv.
 +A:%>X4s ATTR ; ! X4 => WeG, not W1 => no vow ch
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;

LEXICON LAIKI  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Adj's with es-Attr. in WeG & Adv.
 +A:%>W1s ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;

LEXICON LODJI  !!= * __@CODE@__ bisyll V-Adj with -es and -is Attr in WeG
 +A:%>X4s ATTR ; ! #lojis
 +A+Use/NG:%>W1s ATTR ; ! #lojes
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;
! LODJI combines HOHPI and LAIKI. Hohpi now redirected here

!LEXICON VEADDJI ! bisyll, s Attr, no CG
!K ; ne, det er JUHKKIS som er riktig leksikon.

LEXICON JUHKKIS  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Adj. with s-Attr; no Adv.
 +A:s ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
! +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these

LEXICON HAHTTI  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Adj. no Adv.
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
! +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ; !no comparatives for these


LEXICON NUORRA  !!= * __@CODE@__ Bisyll. V-Adj. w/CG, w/o Sep. Attr; no Adv.
 +A:%> ATTR ;
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;

LEXICON RIEKTA  !!= * __@CODE@__  Bisyll adj w/o obl sg forms, WeG Attr
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:a%> ATTR ;     ! riekta
 +A+Use/NG:e%>X4s ATTR ;  ! rievttes
 +A+Dial/%-GG:e%>X9s ATTR ;  ! rivttes
! +A+Attr+Sg+Nom:a%> K ; ! riekta ! tag misnomer?
 +A+Sg+Nom:a%> K ;
 +A+Ess:a%>n K ;
 +A+Dial/%-GG:ás%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A+Use/Sub:as%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 +A+Dial/%-KJ:a%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:a%> ADVV ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:a%> PxV ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:a%>n%> PxC ;
 +A+Use/-Spell:a  VUOHTA ;         ! ... to A > N -vuohta derivation



LEXICON VIELG  !!= * __@CODE@__  adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)
 +A:e%>Y9s¤ ATTR ;
 +A:ad VIELGAT ;

LEXICON VIELGAT !!= * __@CODE@__  
 :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
! +SgNomCmp#+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.

LEXICON VIELG_NOCOMP  !!= * __@CODE@__  adj with -es -attrib. (cns final adj)
 +A:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 +A:ad VIELGAT_NOCOMP ;

LEXICON VIELGAT_NOCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__  
! :%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
 :%> MALLASadj- ;
 :%> GAPPUS0 ;
 +SgNomCmp+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;    ! Removing the #, it prevents these forms
! +SgNomCmp#+Use/-Spell:»X7# NAMAT ;  ! from being let through lookup2cg.


LEXICON CAHKK !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A+Use/NG:e%>Y9s ATTR ;
 :ad JOHTIL ;

LEXICON JALGAT !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A:%>a ATTR ;
 VIELG ;

LEXICON UHCC !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A:a%>W1 ATTR ;
 +A:i%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:i%>X4 BU/MUS ;


LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A:%>is ATTR ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>in K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
! +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:%>at K ;   ! parallel form
 +A:%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
! +A+Use/Sub:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +A+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-Spell:»uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +A+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-Spell:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BIVNNUHEAPME  !!= * __@CODE@__  no bivnnuhis here
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>in K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
 +A+Comp+Sg+Nom:%>at K ;   ! parallel form
 +A:%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Use/Sub:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
! +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +A+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-Spell:»uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +A+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-Spell:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP !!= * __@CODE@__  
 +A:%>is ATTR ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:%>in K ;
 +A+Pl+Nom:%>eame%>t K ; ! parallel form, -it also poss.
 +A:%>eapmi%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Use/Sub:%>eapme7%> HEAPMI ;
 +A+Ess:%>eapmi%>X1n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n K ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X1n%> PxC ;
 +A+Ess+Use/Sub:%>eapmi%>X7n%> PxC ;
 +A+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eapme%>s K ; ! !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Gen:%>eame%> R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:%>eami%> R ;
 +A+Pl+Gen:%>emi%>jd R ;
 +A+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
 +A+Sg+Acc+PxSg3+Use/Sub:%>eame%>s K ; !  !parallel form
! +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS ;
! +A:%>is VUOHTA ; !moved to LEXICON VUOHTA
 +A+Der1+Der2+Der/huvva+V+IV+Use/-Spell:»uvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +A+Der1+Der/huhtti+V+TV+Use/-Spell:»uhtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON OATNI  !!= * __@CODE@__  only this adj
 +A:%> LAIKI0 ;
 +A:%>X4 BU/MUS ;
 +A:%> ADVV ;


!! !!Consonant-final even-syllabic adjectives
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ISSORAS  !!= * __@CODE@__  issoras and certain as-adj. also derivations, final -s
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ;
 +A+Use/Sub: VUOHTA ; ! = issorvuohta
 :ass    DEARVVASLAS2 ; 
 +A+Pl+Nom:assaX4t K ; ! pga Oahpa og Use/NG
 +A:assa%> ISSORASSA2- ;

LEXICON DABALAS  !!= * __@CODE@__   -laš adjectives with short Adv/Comp forms
 +A:%> EABBO/EAMOS_CONT ; 
             :ažž DEARVVASLAS2 ;
     +Use/Sub:ážž  DEARVVASLAS2 ; ! This form (á pro a) is wrong but common. Sub.
             +A:ažža NVDCompAttr_ISSORASSA- ;
     +Use/Sub+A:ážža ISSORASSA- ;
