src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Eahpe_Adjective
eahpegullu+Use/Sub+CmpN/First:eahpi7#gullu NUORRA ;
eahperiekta+CmpN/First:eahpe#riek't RIEKTA ; ! no sg obl
LEXICON Adjective
agibeaibuorre:agi#beai#buorri BUORRE ;
hutkalas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hutkal ISSORAS ;
bahánáhkálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bahá#náhkál DABALAS ;
balahahtti:balahahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
bassi:bassi NUORRA ;
báguheapme:báguh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
bivnnuheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:bivnnuh BIVNNUHEAPME ;
buorre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buorri BUORRE ;
buorre+Use/Sub: BUOROT ; ! !lexeme in e
báddelodji+Use/Sub:báddi7#lod'ji LAIKI ;
devkesruškat:devkes#rušk VIELG_NOCOMP ;
studerenráhkkanahtti:studeren#ráhkkanahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
duollat:duoll CAHKK ;
duskkiheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:duskki7h JEAGOHEAPMI ;
dáluhas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:dáluh ISSORAS ;
eahtturuoksat:eahttu#ruoks VIELG_NOCOMP ;
enharmonalaš:enharmonal DABALAS ;
fasti+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:fas'ti LAIKI ;
fierggeheapme:fierggeh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
fioleahtta:fi^oleahtta NUORRA ;
geasseruškat:geasse#rušk VIELG_NOCOMP ;
geađđat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:geađđ CAHKK ;
geaŋga+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:geaŋ'ga SEARRA ;
gilgat:gilg VIELG ;
goardu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:goar'du LODJI ;
goađeheapme+Use/Sub:goađi7h JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
godjat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:godj CAHKK ;
gudnidovdi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/LexSub:gudni7#dov'da¤ HAHTTI ; ! !
guhkki:guhkki LAIKI "long A" ;
guohttu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:guoh'tu¤ JUHKKIS ;
guvgesruoksat:guvges#ruoks VIELG_NOCOMP ;
gárvveheapme+Use/Sub:gárvvi7h JEAGOHEAPMI ;
hohpi+Use/Sub:hoh'pi LODJI ;
hohpi:hoh'pi HOHPI ;
hudju+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hud'ju HOHPI ;
árpmolaš:árpmol DABALAS ;
hága+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hága SEARRA; !
hávri+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:háv'ri LAIKI ;
hávski+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:hávski ALKI; !
iešbuorre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ieš#buorri BUORRE ;
jalgat:jalg JALGAT ;
jealahas:jealah ISSORAS ;
jorbat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jorb VIELG ;
jállu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jállu LODJI; !
keampa+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:keam'pa SEARRA ;
kula+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:kula NUORRA; !
kvantitatiivvalaš:kvantitatiivval DABALAS ;
lievllisteaddji:lievllisteaddji¤ HAHTTI ;
loažžat:loažž CAHKK ;
lodji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:lod'ji LODJI "tame A" ;
láivi:láj'vi LAIKI ;
lávggaheapme:lávggah JEAGOHEAPMI ;
lávlu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:láv'lu¤ JUHKKIS ;
mihtilmas+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mihtilm ISSORAS ;
muohtavielgat:muohta#vielg VIELG ;
mánáheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:mánáh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
njoammu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:njoammu¤ JUHKKIS ;
oaseheapme+Use/Sub:oasi7h JEAGOHEAPMI ;
oatni+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:oatni OATNI; !
ovddasvásttolaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ovddas#vásttol DABALAS ;
rahkki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:rah'ka¤ JUHKKIS ;
riekta:riek't RIEKTA ; ! no sg obl
riektenuppástuhtti:riekte#nuppástuhtti¤ HAHTTI ;
riiska+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:riis'ka SEARRA ;
rukses-ruoná:rukses-ruoná NUORRA ;
ruššu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ruššu HOHPI; !
ráilu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ráj'lu LAIKI ;
ránesruškat:ráne7s#rušk VIELG ;
seaggi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:seagg UHCC ;
buollisearra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:buolli#searra SEARRA ;
seavdnjat:seavdnj CAHKK ;
seaŋggabuorre:seaŋgga#buorri BUORRE ;
silli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:silli LODJI; !
silli+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:silli HOHPI; !
sitnálaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:sitnál DABALAS ;
soajáheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:soajáh JEAGOHEAPMI ;
stargat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:starg CAHKK ;
udju+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ud'ju HOHPI ;
uhcci+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:uhcc UHCC ;
unni:un'n UHCC ; ! attr unna
varraruoksat:varra#ruoks VIELG_NOCOMP ;
veaddji+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vead'ji¤ JUHKKIS ;
vielgat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vielg VIELG ;
vierggeheapme+Use/Sub:vierggi7h JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
viidnejuhkki+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:viidne#juh'ka¤ JUHKKIS ;
violeahtta:vi^oleahtta NUORRA ;
vuoittuheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:vuoittuh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
váfi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:váfi LODJI; !
vánta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:ván'ta SEARRA ;
vávjjihahtti:vávjji7hahtti¤ HAHTTI ;
áidalas:áidal ISSORAS ;
áigadas:áigad ISSORAS ;
álki:álki ALKI ;
áššeheapme+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:áššeh JEAGOHEAPMI_NOCOMP ;
čorgat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:čorg JALGAT ; ! !
čuovjat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:čuovj VIELG ;
čuvgesruoksat:čuvges#ruoks VIELG_NOCOMP ;
šiervi+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:šier'vi LAIKI ;
šlihtu+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:šlih'tu HOHPI ;
jiešbuorre+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG:jieš#buorri BUORRE ;
